Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-34] Jurisdiction of special
courts-martial. Subject to section 124A-32, special courts-martial have
jurisdiction to try persons subject to this chapter for any offense for which
they may be punished under this chapter. A special court-martial has the same
powers of punishment as a general court-martial, except that a fine imposed by
a special court-martial may not be more than $100 for a single offense. [L
1982, c 171, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next